Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1208
Applicability to contracts entered
into on or after October 1, 2010.

The Nebraska Construction Prompt Pay Act applies to contracts
or subcontracts entered into on or after October 1, 2010.

Laws 2010, LB552, § 8.